Tennessee, session 114, HB0045.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-15-401(a), is amended by
deleting "Class A misdemeanor" and substituting "Class E felony".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July, 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to offenses committed on or after such date.
HB0045
000721
- 1 -